en: Mineral, Minerals
af: Mineraal
an: Mineral
ar: معدن
as: খনিজ পদাৰ্থ
az: Mineral
ba: Минерал, Минера́л
be: Мінерал
bg: Минерал, Минерали
bn: খনিজ
bs: Mineral
ca: Mineral
cs: Minerál, Minerální látky
cy: Mwyn
da: Mineral
de: Mineral, Mineralstoffe, Minerale, Mineralien
el: Ορυκτό, Ανόργανα συστατικά, Ανόργανα άλατα
eo: Mineralo
es: Mineral, Minerales, Sales minerales
et: Mineraal, Mineraalained
eu: Mineral
fa: کانی
fi: Mineraali, Kivennäiset, Mineraalisuola
fr: Minéral, Minéraux, Substances d'apport minéral, Apport minéral, mineraux, Sels minéraux
fy: Mineraal
ga: Mianra
gl: Mineral
he: מינרל
hi: खनिज
hr: mineral, minerali
ht: Mineral
hu: Ásvány, Ásványi anyagok
hy: Միներալ
ia: Mineral
id: Mineral
io: Mineralo
is: Steind, steinefni, steintegund
it: Minerale, Minerali, Sali minerali
ja: ミネラル, 鉱物
jv: Mineral
ka: მინერალები
kk: Минерал
kn: ಖನಿಜ
ko: 광물
ky: Минерал
la: Minerale
lo: ແຮ່ທາດ
lt: Mineralas, Mineralinės medžiagos
lv: Minerāls, Minerālvielas
mk: Минерал
ml: ധാതു
mn: Эрдэс
mr: खनिज
ms: Mineral
mt: Minerali
my: တွင်းထွက်ပစ္စည်း
nb: Mineral
ne: खनिज
nl: Mineraal, Mineralen
nn: Mineral
oc: Minerau
pa: ਖਣਿਜ
pl: Minerał, Składniki mineralne, Składnik mineralny
pt: Mineral, Minerais, Sais Minerais
qu: Qiqlla
ro: Mineral, Minerale
ru: Минерал
sa: खानिजः
sh: Minerali
si: ඛනිජ
sk: Minerál, Minerálne látky
sl: Mineral, Minerali
sn: Muchegwa
so: Macdan
sq: Minerali
sr: Минерал
su: Mineral
sv: Mineral, Mineraler, Mineralämne, Mineralsalt
sw: Madini
ta: கனிமம்
te: మినరల్
th: แร่
tl: Mineral
tr: Mineral
uk: Мінерал, Мінера́л
ur: معدن
uz: Mineral
vi: Khoáng vật
yi: מינעראל
za: Gvangvuz
zh: 礦物

en: Potassium
af: kalium
am: ፖታሺየም
an: Potasio
ar: بوتاسيوم
az: Kalium
ba: Калий
be: Калій
bg: Калий
bn: পটাশিয়াম
bo: དུག་སེལ།
br: Potasiom
bs: kalij
ca: potassi
co: Potassiu
cs: Draslík
cv: Кали
cy: Potasiwm
da: kalium
de: Kalium
dv: ޕޮޓޭސިއަމް
el: Κάλιο
eo: kalio
es: Potasio
et: Kaalium
eu: potasio
fa: پتاسیم
fi: Kalium
fo: Kalium
fr: potassium
ga: potaisiam
gd: Potasium
gl: Potasio
gu: પોટેશિયમ
gv: Potashum
he: אשלגן
hi: पोटैशियम
hr: kalij
ht: Potasyòm
hu: Kálium
hy: կալիում
ia: kalium
id: Kalium
io: kalio
is: kalín
it: Potassio
ja: カリウム
jv: Kalium
ka: კალიუმი
ki: Potasium
kk: Калий
ko: 칼륨
ku: Qelye
kv: Калий
ky: Калий
la: kalium
lb: Kalium
li: Kalium
ln: Potasu
lt: Kalis
lv: Kālijs
mi: konurehu
mk: калиум
ml: പൊട്ടാസ്യം
mn: Кали
mr: पलाश
ms: Kalium
mt: Potassju
my: ပိုတက်ဆီယမ်
nb: kalium
ne: पोटासियम
nl: Kalium
nn: kalium
nv: Kalium
oc: Potassi
or: ପୋଟାସିଅମ
pa: ਪੋਟਾਸ਼ਿਅਮ
pl: Potas
pt: Potássio
qu: Kalyu
ro: Potasiu
ru: калий
sa: पोटासियम्
sh: Kalij
si: පොටෑසියම්
sk: Draslík
sl: Kalij
so: Botashiyaam
sq: Kaliumi
sr: калијум
su: Kalium
sv: Kalium
sw: Kali
ta: பொற்றாசியம்
te: పొటాషియం
tg: Калий
th: โพแทสเซียม
tl: Potasyo
tr: Potasyum
tt: калий
ug: كالىي
uk: калій
ur: اُشنانصر
uz: Kaliy
vi: kali
wa: Potassiom
yi: קאליום
yo: Potassium
za: Gyaz
zh: 钾

en: potassium bicarbonate
bg: Калиев бикарбонат
cs: hydrogenuhličitan draselný
de: Kaliumbicarbonat
el: διττανθρακικό κάλιο
es: bicarbonato de potasio
et: kaaliumvesinikkarbonaat
fi: kaliumbikarbonaatti
fr: bicarbonate de potassium
hu: kálium-bikarbonát
it: bicarbonato di potassio
ja: 炭酸水素カリウム
lt: kalio bikarbonatas
lv: kālija bikarbonāts
mt: bikarbunat tal-potassju
nl: kaliumwaterstofcarbonaat, kaliumbicarbonaat
pl: diwęglan potasu
pt: bicarbonato de potássio
ro: bicarbonat de potasiu
sk: hydrogénuhličitan draselný
sl: kalijev bikarbonat
sv: kaliumbikarbonat

en: potassium carbonate
bg: Калиев карбонат
cs: uhličitan draselný
el: ανθρακικό κάλιο
es: carbonato de potasio
et: kaaliumkarbonaat
fi: kaliumkarbonaatti
fr: carbonate de potassium
hu: kálium-karbonát
it: carbonato di potassio
ja: 炭酸カリウム
lt: kalio karbonatas
lv: kālija karbonāts
mt: karbunat tal-potassju
nl: kaliumcarbonaat
pl: węglan potasu
pt: carbonato de potássio
ro: carbonat de potasiu
sk: uhličitan draselný
sl: kalijev karbonat
sv: kaliumkarbonat

en: potassium chloride
ar: كلوريد البوتاسيوم
bg: Калиев хлорид
bn: পটাশিয়াম ক্লোরাইড
bs: Kalij hlorid
ca: clorur de potassi
cs: Chlorid draselný
cy: potasiwm clorid
da: kaliumklorid
de: Kaliumchlorid
el: Χλωριουχο καλιο
eo: kalia klorido
es: cloruro potásico
et: Kaaliumkloriid
fa: پتاسیم کلرید
fi: kaliumkloridi
fr: chlorure de potassium
gl: Cloruro de potasio
gv: Cloreed potashum
he: אשלגן כלורי
hi: पोटेशियम क्लोराइड
hr: Kalijev klorid
hu: kálium-klorid
hy: Կալիումի քլորիդ
id: Potasium klorida
it: cloruro di potassio
ja: 塩化カリウム
ka: კალიუმის ქლორიდი
kk: Калий хлориді
ko: 염화 칼륨
ky: Калий хлориди
lt: Kalio chloridas
lv: Kālija hlorīds
ml: പൊട്ടാസ്യം ക്ലോറൈഡ്
ms: Kalium klorida
mt: Klorur tal-potassju
nb: kaliumklorid
nl: kaliumchloride
or: ପୋଟାସିଅମ କ୍ଲୋରାଇଡ
pl: chlorek potasu
pt: cloreto de potássio
ro: Clorură de potasiu
ru: хлорид калия
sh: Kalijum hlorid
sk: Chlorid draselný
sl: kalijev klorid
sr: калијум хлорид
sv: kaliumklorid
ta: பொட்டாசியம் குளோரைடு
te: పొటాషియం క్లోరైడ్
th: โพแทสเซียมคลอไรด์
tr: Potasyum klorür
uk: Хлорид калію
vi: Kali clorua
zh: 氯化钾

en: Potassium citrates
ca: Citrats de potassi
de: Kaliumcitraten
es: Citratos de potasio
fr: Citrates de potassium
it: Citrati di potassio
ja: クエン酸一カリウム及びクエン酸三カリウム
nl: Kaliumcitraten
pt: Citratos de potássio
sv: Kaliumcitrater

en: Tripotassium citrate, potassium citrate
bg: Трикалиев цитрат, Калиев цитрат
bs: Kalij citrat
cs: Tripotassium citrate, citronan draselný
cy: Potasiwm sitrad
da: Trikaliumcitrat
de: Trikaliumcitrat, Kaliumcitrat
el: κιτρικό κάλιο
eo: E332(ii), Kalia citrato tribaza
es: Citrato tripotásico, citrato de potasio
et: kaaliumtsitraat
fa: پتاسیم سیترات
fi: Trikaliumsitraatti, Trikaliumsitraattia, kaliumsitraatti
fr: Citrate tripotassique, citrate de potassium
hu: Trikálium-citrát, kálium-citrát
it: Citrato tripotassico, citrato di potassio
ja: クエン酸三カリウム, クエン酸カリウム
lt: Trikalio citratas, kalio citratas
lv: Trikālija citrāts, kālija citrāts
mt: Ċitrat tripotassiku, ċitrat tal-potassju
nb: Kaliumsitrat
nl: Trikaliumcitraat, kaliumcitraat, kaliumzouten van citroenzuur
pl: Cytrynian tripotasowy, cytrynian potasu
pt: Citrato tripotássico, citrato de potássio
ro: Citrat tripotasic, citrat de potasiu
ru: цитрат калия
sk: Citran tridraselný, citran draselný
sl: Trikalijev citrat, kalijev citrat
sr: Kalijum citrat
sv: Trikaliumcitrat, kaliumcitrat
ta: பொட்டாசியம் சிட்ரேட்டு
te: పొటాషియం సిట్రేట్
vi: Kali xitrat
zh: 檸檬酸鉀

en: potassium gluconate
bg: Калиев глюконат
cs: glukonan draselný
de: Kaliumgluconat
el: γλυκονικό κάλιο
es: gluconato de potasio
et: kaaliumglükonaat
fi: kaliumglukonaatti
fr: gluconate de potassium
hu: kálium-glükonát
it: gluconato di potassio
ja: グルコン酸カリウム
lt: kalio gliukonatas
lv: kālija glikonāts
mt: glukonat tal-potassju
nl: kaliumgluconaat
pl: glukonian potasu
pt: gluconato de potássio
ro: gluconat de potasiu
sk: glukonát draselný
sl: kalijev glukonat
sv: kaliumglukonat

en: potassium glycerophosphate
bg: Калиев глицерофосфат
cs: glycerofosforečnan draselný
de: Kaliumglycerophosphat
el: γλυκεροφωσφορικό κάλιο
es: glicerofosfato de potasio
et: kaaliumglütserofosfaat
fi: kaliumglyserofosfaatti
fr: glycérophosphate de potassium
hu: kálium-glicerofoszfát
it: glicerofosfato di potassio
lt: kalio glicerofosfatas
lv: kālija glicerofosfāts
mt: gliċerofosfat tal-potassju
nl: kaliumglycerofosfaat
pl: glicerofosforan potasu
pt: glicerofosfato de potássio
ro: glicerofosfat de potasiu
sk: glycerofosfát draselný
sl: kalijev glicerofosfat
sv: kaliumglycerolfosfat

en: Potassium phosphate
de: Kaliumphosphat
fr: Phosphate de potassium, orthophosphate de potassium
it: Fosfato di potassio

en: potassium lactate
bg: Калиев лактат
cs: mléčnan draselný
de: Kaliumlactat
el: γαλακτικό κάλιο
es: lactato de potasio
et: kaaliumlaktaat
fi: kaliumlaktaatti
fr: lactate de potassium
hu: kálium-laktát
it: lattato di potassio
ja: 乳酸カリウム
lt: kalio laktatas
lv: kālija laktāts
mt: laktat tal-potassju
nl: kaliumlactaat
pl: mleczan potasu
pt: lactato de potássio
ro: lactat de potasiu
sk: mliečnan draselný
sl: kalijev laktat
sv: kaliumlaktat

en: potassium hydroxide
bg: Калиев хидроксид
cs: hydroxid draselný
de: Kaliumhydroxid
el: υδροξείδιο καλίου
es: hidróxido de potasio
et: kaaliumhüdroksiid
fi: kaliumhydroksidi
fr: hydroxyde de potassium
hu: kálium-hidroxid
it: idrossido di potassio
ja: 水酸化カリウム, カセイカリ
lt: kalio hidroksidas
lv: kālija hidroksīds
mt: idrossidu tal-potassju
nl: kaliumhydroxide
pl: wodorotlenek potasu
pt: hidróxido de potássio
ro: hidroxid de potasiu
sk: hydroxid draselný
sl: kalijev hidroksid
sv: kaliumhydroxid

en: potassium salts of orthophosphoric acid
bg: Калиеви соли на ортофосфорната киселина
cs: draselné soli kyseliny fosforečné
de: Kaliumsalze der Orthophosphorsäure
el: άλατα καλίου του ορθοφωσφορικού οξέος
es: sales potásicas de ácido ortofosfórico
et: ortofosforhappe kaaliumisoolad
fi: ortofosforihapon kaliumsuolat
fr: sels de potassium de l’acide orthophosphorique
hu: kálium ortofoszforsavval alkotott sói
it: sali di potassio dell’acido ortofosforico
lt: ortofosforo rūgšties kalio druskos
lv: ortofosforskābes kālija sāļi
mt: melħ tal-potassju tal-aċidu ortofosforiku
nl: kaliumzouten van orthofosforzuur
pl: sole potasowe kwasu ortofosforowego
pt: sais de potássio do ácido ortofosfórico
ro: săruri de potasiu ale acidului ortofosforic
sk: draselné soli kyseliny ortofosforečnej
sl: kalijeve soli ortofosforne kisline
sv: kaliumsalter av ortofosforsyra

en: calcium
af: kalsium
am: ካልሲየም
an: Calcio
ar: كالسيوم
az: Kalsium
ba: Кальций
be: Кальцый
bg: Калций
bn: ক্যালসিয়াম
bo: དཀར་ཤམ།
br: Kalsiom
bs: kalcij
ca: calci
co: Calciu
cs: Vápník
cv: Кальци
cy: Calsiwm
da: calcium
de: Calcium
dv: ކެލްސިއަމް
el: Ασβέστιο
eo: kalcio
es: Calcio
et: Kaltsium
eu: kaltzio
fa: کلسیم
fi: Kalsium
fo: Kalsium
fr: calcium
ga: Cailciam
gd: Calcium
gl: Calcio
gn: Itakairã
gu: કેલ્શિયમ
gv: Kelkium
he: סידן
hi: कैल्शियम
hr: kalcij
ht: Kalsyòm
hu: Kalcium
hy: կալցիում
ia: calcium
id: Kalsium
io: kalcio
is: kalsín
it: Calcio
ja: カルシウム
jv: Kalsium
ka: კალციუმი
ki: Calcium
kk: Кальций
kn: ಕ್ಯಾಲ್ಶಿಯಮ್
ko: 칼슘
ku: Kalsiyûm
kv: Кальций
ky: Кальций
la: calcium
lb: Kalzium
li: Calcium
lt: Kalcis
lv: Kalcijs
mi: konupūmā
mk: Калциум
ml: കാൽ സ്യം
mn: Кальци
mr: कॅल्शियम
ms: Kalsium
mt: Kalċju
my: ကယ်လဆီယမ်
nb: kalsium
ne: क्याल्सियम
nl: Calcium
nn: kalsium
nv: Káálsiiyin
oc: Calci
or: କ୍ୟାଲ୍‌ସିଅମ
pa: ਕੈਲਸ਼ੀਅਮ
pi: क्याल्सियम
pl: Wapń
pt: Cálcio
qu: Isku q'illay
ro: Calciu
ru: кальций
sa: क्याल्सियम
sh: Kalcij
si: කැල්සියම්
sk: Vápnik
sl: Kalcij
so: Kaalshiyaam
sq: Kalciumi
sr: калцијум
su: Kalsium
sv: Kalcium
sw: Kalisi
ta: கல்சியம்
te: కాల్షియమ్
tg: Калсий
th: แคลเซียม
tl: Kalsiyo
tr: kalsiyum
tt: кәлси
ug: كالتىسىي
uk: кальцій
ur: جمصر
uz: Kalsiy
vi: canxi
yi: קאלציום
yo: Calcium
zh: 钙

en: Calcium carbonate, CI Pigment White 18, Chalk
af: Kalsiumkarbonaat
an: Carbonato calcico
ar: كربونات الكالسيوم
bg: Калциев карбонат, CI бял пигмент 18
bn: ক্যালসিয়াম কার্বনেট
bs: Kalcij-karbonat
ca: Carbonat de calci, Carbonat càlcic
cs: Uhličitan vápenatý, CI bílý pigment 18
cy: calsiwm carbonad
da: Calciumcarbonat, CI Pigment White 18
de: Calciumcarbonat, Pigment White 18, Kalk
el: Ανθρακικο ασβεστιο, Λευκό CI Pigment 18
eo: kalcia karbonato
es: Carbonato de calcio, CI Pigment White 18, Carbonato cálcico
et: Kaltsiumkarbonaat, CI valge pigment 18
eu: Kaltzio karbonato
fa: کلسیم کربنات
fi: Kalsiumkarbonaatti, Kalsiumkarbonaattia, CI Pigment White 18
fr: Carbonate de calcium, Pigment blanc C. I. no 18
ga: carbónáit chailciam
gl: Carbonato de calcio
gv: Carboanaayt kelkium
he: סידן פחמתי
hi: कैल्सियम कार्बोनेट
hr: Kalcijev karbonat
hu: Kalcium-karbonát, CI Pigment White 18
hy: Կալցիումի կարբոնատ
id: calsium carbonat
is: Kalsíumkarbónat
it: Carbonato di calcio, CI pigmento bianco 18
ja: 炭酸カルシウム
ko: 탄산 칼슘
ky: Кальций карбонаты
la: Carbonatum calcii
lt: Kalcio karbonatas, Baltasis pigmentas CI Nr. 18
lv: Kalcija karbonāts, CI baltais pigments 18
mk: Калциум карбонат
ml: ചുണ്ണാമ്പ്
mr: कॅल्शियम कार्बोनेट
mt: Karbonat tal-kalċju, CI Pigment White 18
my: Kalsium karbonat
nb: kalsiumkarbonat
nl: Calciumcarbonaat, CI Pigment White 18
nn: kalsiumkarbonat
oc: Carbonat de calci
pl: Węglan wapnia, CI Pigment biały 18
pt: Carbonato de cálcio, Pigmento branco CI 18
ro: Carbonat de calciu, Pigment alb CI 18
ru: карбонат кальция
sh: Kalcijum karbonat
si: කැල්සියම් කාබනේට්
sk: Uhličitan vápenatý, CI pigment biely 18
sl: Kalcijev karbonat, CI Pigment White 18
sr: калцијум карбонат
sv: Kalciumkarbonat, CI Pigment White 18
ta: கால்சியம் கார்பனேட்
th: แคลเซียมคาร์บอเนต
tr: Kalsiyum karbonat
uk: Карбонат кальцію
uz: Kalsiy karbonat
vi: canxi cacbonat
zh: 碳酸鈣

en: calcium chloride
bg: Калциев хлорид
cs: chlorid vápenatý
de: Calciumchlorid
el: χλωριούχο ασβέστιο
es: cloruro cálcico
et: kaltsiumkloriid
fi: kalsiumkloridi
fr: chlorure de calcium
hu: kalcium-klorid
it: cloruro di calcio
ja: 塩化カルシウム
lt: kalcio chloridas
lv: kalcija hlorīds
mt: klorur tal-kalċju
nl: calciumchloride
pl: chlorek wapnia
pt: cloreto de cálcio
ro: clorură de calciu
sk: chlorid vápenatý
sl: kalcijev klorid
sv: kalciumklorid

en: calcium salts
es: sales de calcio
it: sali di calcio

en: calcium salts from orthophosphoric acid, calcium salts of orthophosphoric acid
bg: Калциеви соли на ортофосфорната киселина
cs: vápenaté soli kyseliny fosforečné
de: Calciumcitrat aus Orthophosphorsäure
el: άλατα ασβεστίου του ορθοφωσφορικού οξέος
es: sales de calcio de ácido ortofosfórico
et: ortofosforhappe kaltsiumisoolad
fi: ortofosforihapon kalsiumsuolat
fr: sels de calcium de l'acide orthophosphorique
hu: kalcium ortofoszforsavval alkotott sói
it: sali di calcio dell’acido ortofosforico
lt: ortofosforo rūgšties kalcio druskos
lv: ortofosforskābes kalcija sāļi
mt: melħ tal-kalċju tal-aċidu ortofosforiku
nl: calciumzouten van orthofosforzuur
pl: sole wapniowe kwasu ortofosforowego
pt: sais de calcio de acido ortofosforico
ro: săruri de calciu ale acidului ortofosforic
sk: vápenaté soli kyseliny ortofosforečnej
sl: kalcijeve soli ortofosforne kisline
sv: kalciumsalter av ortofosforsyra

en: calcium gluconate
bg: Калциев глюконат
ca: Gluconat de calci
cs: glukonan vápenatý
de: Calciumgluconat, Kalziumglukonat
el: γλυκονικό ασβέστιο
es: Gluconato cálcico, Gluconato de calcio
et: kaltsiumglükonaat
fi: Kalsiumglukonaatti, Kalsiumglukonaattia
fr: Gluconate de calcium, Pentahydroxyéthanoate de calcium, Gluconate calcique
hu: kalcium-glükonát
it: gluconato di calcio
ja: グルコン酸カルシウム
lt: kalcio gliukonatas
lv: kalcija glikonāts
mt: glukonat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumgluconaat
pl: Glukonian wapnia, calcio gluconato
pt: gluconato de cálcio
ro: gluconat de calciu
sk: glukónan vápenatý
sl: kalcijev glukonat
sv: kalciumglukonat

en: calcium glycerophosphate
ar: فوسفات غليسيريل الكالسيوم
bg: Калциев глицерофосфат
cs: glycerofosforečnan vápenatý
de: Calciumglycerophosphat
el: γλυκεροφωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: glicerofosfato de calcio
et: kaltsiumglütserofosfaat
fi: Kalsiumglyserofosfaatti, Kalsiumglyserofosfaattia
fr: glycérophosphate de calcium
hu: kalcium-glicerofoszfát
it: glicerofosfato di calcio
lt: kalcio glicerofosfatas
lv: kalcija glicerofosfāts
mt: gliċerofosfat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumglycerofosfaat
pl: glicerofosforan wapnia
pt: glicerofosfato de cálcio
ro: glicerofosfat de calciu
ru: Глицерофосфат кальция
sh: Kalcijum glicerilfosfat
sk: glycerofosforečnan vápenatý
sl: kalcijev glicerofosfat
sr: Kalcijum glicerilfosfat
sv: kalciumglycerolfosfat